Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 21. Miscellaneous Provisions.

§ 13.1-781.
Property title records.

Whenever the records in the office of the clerk of the Commission reflect that a domestic or foreign corporation has changed or corrected its name, merged into a domestic or foreign corporation or eligible entity, converted into a domestic or foreign eligible entity, or domesticated in or from another jurisdiction, the clerk of the Commission, upon request, shall issue a certificate reciting such change, correction, merger, conversion or domestication. The certificate may be admitted to record in the deed books, in accordance with §

17.1-227

, of any clerk’s office within the jurisdiction of which any property of the corporation is located in order to maintain the continuity of title records. The person filing the certificate shall pay a fee of $10 to the clerk of the court, but no tax shall be due thereon.

Whenever a foreign corporation has changed or corrected its name, merged into another business entity, converted into another type of business entity, or domesticated in another jurisdiction, and it cannot or chooses not to obtain a certificate reciting such change, correction, merger, conversion or domestication from the clerk of the Commission pursuant to subsection A, a similar certificate by any competent authority of the foreign corporation’s jurisdiction of incorporation may be admitted to record in the deed books, in accordance with §

17.1-227

, of any clerk’s office within the jurisdiction of which any property of the corporation is located in order to maintain the continuity of title records. The person filing the certificate shall pay a fee of $10 to the clerk of the court, but no tax shall be due thereon.

History.

2007, c. 771.